Montana, session 2025, LC2241.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Prohibiting weather modification. (1) A person may not intentionally
inject, release, or disperse chemicals, chemical compounds, substances, or apparatuses within the borders of
the state from an aircraft expressly for:
(a) engaging in weather modification and control;
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC2241.1
(b) affecting temperature; or
(c) affecting the intensity of the sunlight.
(2) The department of justice, established in 2-15-2001, shall establish and make publicly available
on its website an e-mail address and an online form for persons to report observed violations pursuant to this
section.
(3) The department of justice may adopt rules necessary to implement subsection (2).
(4) As used in this section, the following definitions apply:
(a) "Aircraft" means any manned or unmanned aerial vehicle or device that is used or intended to
be used for flight in the air.
(b) "Weather modification and control" means changing or controlling or attempting to change or
control by artificial methods the natural development of atmospheric cloud forms or precipitation forms that
occur in the troposphere.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Enforcement. When the department of justice believes that a violation of
[section 1] has occurred, it may initiate action under 75-2-413. The department of justice may pursue
enforcement action against the federal government for a violation of [section 1].

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Repealer. The following sections of the Montana Code Annotated are
repealed:
85-3-101. Definitions.
85-3-102. Standards for research in weather modification control.
85-3-103. Department powers.
85-3-104. Nonliability of state and agents for acts of private persons.
85-3-105. Violation as misdemeanor and continuing violations.
85-3-201. License and permit required for weather modification and control.
85-3-202. Department to review applications.
85-3-203. Licenses -- qualifications of licensees.
85-3-204. Licenses -- term and renewal.
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC2241.1
85-3-205. License or renewal fee.
85-3-206. Permits -- requirements and hearing.
85-3-207. Separate permit for each operation.
85-3-208. Notice of intention to apply for permit.
85-3-209. Notice of intention -- contents.
85-3-210. Publication of notice of intention.
85-3-211. Proof of financial responsibility by applicant.
85-3-212. Permit fee.
85-3-213. State special revenue fund.
85-3-214. Termination of licenses and permits.
85-3-301. Records of operations maintained by licensees.
85-3-302. Reports of operations.
85-3-303. Records and reports open to public.
85-3-401. Definitions.
85-3-411. Weather modification authority created by petition -- expiration -- reinstatement.
85-3-412. Petition content.
85-3-413. Creation of authority by election.
85-3-414. Creation of authority by resolution.
85-3-415. Creation of authority by vote after resolution of county commissioners.
85-3-416. Abolishment of authority by election.
85-3-417. Procedure for abolishment of authority by recall petition -- petition form -- disposition of funds.
85-3-421. Commissioners -- compensation -- meetings -- officers -- disbursements.
85-3-422. Tax certified by weather modification authority -- disposition of proceeds.
85-3-423. County budget waived for first appropriation -- conditions.
85-3-424. Declaration of emergency -- hearing -- determination of need for weather modification
operation.

NEW SECTION. Section 4. Codification instruction. [Sections 1 and 2] are intended to be codified
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC2241.1
as an integral part of Title 75, chapter 2, and the provisions of Title 75, chapter 2, apply to [sections 1 and 2].
- END -
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – ****